Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201248-436
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 48-436
to 48-442, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) High voltage means a
voltage in excess of six
hundred volts, measured between conductors, or measured between
the conductor and the ground; and

(2) Authorized and qualified persons includes employees
of any electric utility, public power district, or public power and irrigation district with
respect to the electrical systems of such utilities, employees of communications
utilities, common carriers engaged in interstate commerce, state, county, or municipal agencies with
respect to work relating to their facilities on the poles or structures of
an electric utility or railway transportation system, employees of a railway
transportation system or a metropolitan utilities district engaged in the
normal operation of such system, and employees of a contractor with respect
to work under his or her supervision
when such work is being performed under contract for, or as an agent of, the
owner of the above utilities, companies, or
agencies, so long as all such
persons meet the requirements for working near overhead high voltage conductors
as provided in 29 C.F.R. 1910.269(a)(2)(ii) through 1910.269(a)(3), as such
regulations existed on July 19, 2012.

Laws 1969, c. 390, § 1, p. 1370;

Laws 2012, LB997, § 1.
July 19, 2012